apertium-kan.kan.lexc
LEXICON __cnjsub
%<cnjsub%>: # ;

LEXICON __inj
%<inj%>: # ;

LEXICON James__np
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ರು # ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<hon%>:ಯವರ # ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ನು # ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>%<hon%>:ರ # ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ನ # ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ನಿಗೆ # ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>%<hon%>:ನವರ # ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ವನ್ನು # ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ನನ್ನು # ;

!Harry ಹ್ಯಾರಿ
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಯು # ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ಯ # ;


LEXICON Vishnu__np
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ವಿನ # ;


LEXICON org__np
%<np%>%<org%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<org%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: #;
%<np%>%<org%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಯು #;
%<np%>%<org%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಗಳು #;
%<np%>%<org%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ಗಳೇ #;
%<np%>%<org%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ಯನ್ನು #;
%<np%>%<org%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ಗಳನ್ನು #;
%<np%>%<org%>%<sg%>%<acc%>%<emph%>:ಯನ್ನೇ #;!
%<np%>%<org%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಗೆ  #;
%<np%>%<org%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ಗಳಿಗೆ #;
%<np%>%<org%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ಯ #;
%<np%>%<org%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ಗಳ #;
%<np%>%<org%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ಯಲ್ಲಿ #;
%<np%>%<org%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ಗಳಲ್ಲಿ #;
%<np%>%<org%>%<sp%>%<ins%>:ಯಿಂದ #;!
%<np%>%<org%>%<sp%>%<ins%>:ಗಳಿಂದ #;!

LEXICON cog__np
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<hon%>:ರು # ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>%<hon%>:ರ # ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<hon%>:ಗಳು # ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<hon%>:ಯವರು # ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ನ # ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ನು # ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>%<hon%>:ಯವರ # ;

LEXICON AL__np
%<np%>%<al%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ದ # ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ಯ # ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ಯಲ್ಲಿ # ;

LEXICON hyd__np
%<np%>%<hyd%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<hyd%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಯ # ;

LEXICON ಮೇರಿ__np
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;

LEXICON neut__np
%<np%>%<al%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;

LEXICON ಬೆಂಗಳೂರು__np
%<np%>%<top%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ು # ;!
%<np%>%<top%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ಿನ # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ನ # ;!mumbai-na ಮುಂಬೈನ
%<np%>%<top%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ಿನಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಿಗೆ # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ಿನಿಂದ # ;

LEXICON ಇಟಲಿ__np
%<np%>%<top%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಯು # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ಯ # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಗೆ # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ನಲ್ಲ # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ಯಲ್ಲಿ # ;!

LEXICON ಭಾರತ__np
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;!%<nt%>
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ವು # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಕ್ಕೆ # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ದ # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ದಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ದಲ್ಲ ide__vaux ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ದಲ್ಲ oo__inc_clit ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<loc%>%<emph%>:ದಲ್ಲೇ # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ವನ್ನು # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<loc%>%<gen%>:ದಲ್ಲಿನ # ;!ಭಾರತದಲ್ಲಿನ
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ದಿಂದ # ;

%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<loc%>%<nom%>%+ದಾದ್ಯಂತ%<post%>:ದಾದ್ಯಂತ # ;!ಭಾರತದಲ್ಲಿನ

LEXICON Acronym‌/__np
%<np%>%<acr%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<acr%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ನಲ್ಲಿ # ;


LEXICON ಇತರೆ/__prn
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ೆ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ರು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ರಿಗೆ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ರ # ;!ಇತರರೊಡಗೂಡಿಯೂ
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ರ odane ;!odag

LEXICON ಆಕೆ/__prn
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<hon%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<hon%>%<nom%>:ಯು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<hon%>%<gen%>:ಯ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<hon%>%<acc%>:ಯನ್ನು # ;!
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<hon%>%<dat%>:ಗೆ # ;!
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<hon%>%<loc%>:ಯಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<hon%>%<ins%>:ಯಿಂದ # ;


LEXICON ನ/__prn
%<prn%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಾ # ;
%<prn%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಾನು # ;
%<prn%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ನ್ನನು # ;
%<prn%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ನ್ನನ್ನು # ;!ನ
%<prn%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ನಿಗೆ # ;!ನನಗೆ
%<prn%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ನಗೆ # ;!ನ
%<prn%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ನ್ನ # ;
%<prn%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ನಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<prn%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ನ್ನಿಂದ # ;

%<prn%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಾವು # ;
%<prn%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ಮ್ಮನು # ;
%<prn%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ಮ್ಮನ್ನು # ;
%<prn%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ಮಗೆ # ;
%<prn%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ಮ್ಮ # ;
%<prn%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ಮ್ಮಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<prn%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ಮ್ಮಿಂದ # ;



LEXICON ನೀ/__prn
%<prn%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ೀ # ;!ನ 
%<prn%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ೀನು # ;!ನ 
%<prn%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ಿನ್ನನು # ;
%<prn%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ಿನ್ನನ್ನು # ;
%<prn%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಿನಿಗೆ # ;
%<prn%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಿನಗೆ # ;
%<prn%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ಿನ್ನ # ;
%<prn%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ಿನಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<prn%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ಿನ್ನಿಂದ # ;

%<prn%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ೀವು # ;
%<prn%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ಿಮ್ಮನ್ನು # ;
%<prn%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ಿಮ್ಮನು # ;
%<prn%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ಿಮಗೆ # ;
%<prn%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sp%>%<hon%>%<gen%>:ಿಮ್ಮ # ;
!%<prn%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ಿಮ್ಮ # ;
%<prn%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ಿಮ್ಮಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<prn%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ಿಮ್ಮಿಂದ # ;

LEXICON ondige
%+ಒಂದಿಗೆ%<post%>%<dat%>:ೊಂದಿಗಿನ # ;
%+ಒಂದಿಗೆ%<post%>:ೊಂದಿಗೆ # ;!wrong?
%+ಒಂದಿಗೆ%<post%>:ೊಂದಿಗೆ # ;!ನ


LEXICON ondige2
%+ಒಂದಿಗೆ%<post%>%<dat%>ಯೊಂದಿಗೆಿನ # ;
%+ಒಂದಿಗೆ%<post%>:ಯೊಂದಿಗೆ  # ;

LEXICON odane
%+ಒಡನೆ%<post%>:ೊಡನೆ # ;!ಡಗೂಡಿ
%+ಒಡನೆ%<post%>:ೊಡಗೂಡಿ # ;
%+ಒಡನೆ%<post%>:ೊಡಗೂಡಿಯ oo__inc_clit ;

LEXICON ಅವ/__prn!ava
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ನೇ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ನು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ನನ್ನು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ನಿಗೆ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ನ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ನಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ನಿಂದ # ;



%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಳು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ಳನ್ನು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಳಿಗೆ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ಳ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ಳಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ಳಿಂದ # ;

%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ರ ondige  ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<hon%>%<nom%>:ರ ondige  ;

%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ರು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ವರ oo__inc_clit ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ವರುಗಳು #;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ರೇ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ರನ್ನು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<hon%>%<acc%>:ರನ್ನು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ರಿಗೆ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ರ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ರವರ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ರದು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<hon%>%<gen%>:ರ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ರಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ರಿಂದ # ;

%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>%<emph%>:ರದೇ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%+ಎರಡು%<num%>:ರಿಬ್ಬರ oo__inc_clit;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>%+ಎರಡು%<num%>:ರಿಬ್ಬರ #;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%+ಒಂದು%<num%>:ರೊಬ್ಬ #;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ರ odane ;

LEXICON NounRoot
ಸೆಟ್:ಸೆಟ್ 						James__np;
ಮೋಹನ್:ಮೋಹನ್ 				James__np;
ಅಖಿಲ:ಅಖಿಲ 					James__np;
ಅಂಡರ್‌ಟೇಕರ್‌:ಅಂಡರ್‌ಟೇಕರ್‌ 			James__np;
ಬ್ರೂಸ್:ಬ್ರೂಸ್ 				James__np;
ಬಬಲೇಶ್ವರ:ಬಬಲೇಶ್ವರ           James__np;
ಎಡ್ವಿನ್:ಎಡ್ವಿನ್  					James__np;
ಅನಂತ್:ಅನಂತ್ 	 						James__np;
ಅಲೆಗ್ಸಾಂಡರ್:ಅಲೆಗ್ಸಾಂಡರ್ 	 						James__np;
ಆಂಗ್:ಆಂಗ್ 	 							James__np; 	
ಲಿಂಪ್:ಲಿಂಪ್ 	 							James__np; 	
ಲುಯಿಸ್:ಲುಯಿಸ್ 	 							James__np; 	
ವಿಷ್ಣು:ವಿಷ್ಣು 				Vishnu__np;
ರಾಜು:ರಾಜು 					Vishnu__np;
ಲೀಲಾ:ಲೀಲಾ 						ಮೇರಿ__np;
ಮೀರಾ:ಮೀರಾ 						ಮೇರಿ__np;
ಮಾಯಾ:ಮಾಯಾ 						ಮೇರಿ__np;
ಭಾರತಿ:ಭಾರತಿ                      	ಮೇರಿ__np;
ಮಹಾಲಕ್ಷ್ಮಿ:ಮಹಾಲಕ್ಷ್ಮಿ          	ಮೇರಿ__np;
ಶ್ವೇತ:ಶ್ವೇತ 						ಮೇರಿ__np;
ಗೀತಾ:ಗೀತಾ                       ಮೇರಿ__np;
ರೋಸ್:ರೋಸ್    					ಮೇರಿ__np;
ಮಿಚೆಲ್:ಮಿಚೆಲ್ 					ಮೇರಿ__np;
ಅನ್ನಾ:ಅನ್ನಾ 						ಮೇರಿ__np;	
ಉಷಾ:ಉಷಾ 						ಮೇರಿ__np;
ಲತಾ:ಲತಾ 							ಮೇರಿ__np;
ವುಡ್ಸ್:ವುಡ್ಸ್ 				cog__np;
ಪಾಂಟಿಂಗ್:ಪಾಂಟಿಂಗ್ 				cog__np;
ಗಿಲ್‌ಕ್ರಿಸ್ಟ್‌:ಗಿಲ್‌ಕ್ರಿಸ್ಟ್‌ 			cog__np;
ಸೆನಾ:ಸೆನಾ 							cog__np;
ಅಯ್ಯರ್:ಅಯ್ಯರ್     				cog__np;
ಹಿಮ್ಲರ್:ಹಿಮ್ಲರ್  					cog__np;
ಹಂಟ್:ಹಂಟ್ 	 					cog__np;
ವೊನ್:ವೊನ್ 	 					cog__np;
ಪಾಟೀಲ್:ಪಾಟೀಲ್ 	 					cog__np;
ಲೆಪ್ಪಾರ್ಡ್:ಲೆಪ್ಪಾರ್ಡ್  					cog__np;
ಘೋಷ್:ಘೋಷ್  					cog__np;
ಎಂ:ಎಂ 						cog__np;!M
ಅಮೈನೋ:ಅಮೈನೋ 				AL__np;
ಓಂ:ಓಂ 						AL__np;!Om
ಸಿಖ್:ಸಿಖ್ 					AL__np;!Sikh
ಅದ್ವೈತ:ಅದ್ವೈತ 				AL__np;
ಇಸ್ಲಾಮ್:ಇಸ್ಲಾಮ್     			AL__np;
ಪ್ರೊಟೆಸ್ಟೆಂಟ್:ಪ್ರೊಟೆಸ್ಟೆಂಟ್ 						AL__np;	
ಮಾರ್ವೆಲ್:ಮಾರ್ವೆಲ್ 						AL__np;	
ಇಂಗ್ಲೀಷ್:ಇಂಗ್ಲೀಶ್ 			AL__np;	
ಘಡ್:ಘಡ್ 	 						AL__np;	
ಎಥಿಲೀನ್:ಎಥಿಲೀನ್ 	 						AL__np;	
ಹಬಲ್:ಹಬಲ್ 	 						AL__np;	
ನೆಸ್:ನೆಸ್ 	 						AL__np;	
ಕಾವೇರಿ:ಕಾವೇರಿ 					hyd__np;!
ಗಂಗಾ:ಗಂಗಾ 					hyd__np;
ಅರಬ್ಬೀ:ಅರಬ್ಬೀ 				hyd__np;	
ನೈಲ್:ನೈಲ್ 					hyd__np;
ಸಿಂಧೂ:ಸಿಂಧೂ 					hyd__np;
ಕ್ಯಾಸ್ಪಿಯನ್:ಕ್ಯಾಸ್ಪಿಯನ್ 		hyd__np;
ಹಡ್ಸನ್:ಹಡ್ಸನ್  				hyd__np;
ಥೇಮ್ಸ್:ಥೇಮ್ಸ್  				hyd__np;
ತುಂಗಭದ್ರಾ:ತುಂಗಭದ್ರಾ 			hyd__np;
ಇಂಟೆಲ್:ಇಂಟೆಲ್ 					org__np;
ಪಾಲೊ:ಪಾಲೊ                   	org__np;
ಎಬಿಸಿ:ಎಬಿಸಿ                     	org__np;
ವೆಲ್ಷ್:ವೆಲ್ಷ್ 						org__np;
ಲೈಕ್:ಲೈಕ್ 	 						org__np;
ಫಿಜರ್:ಫಿಜರ್ 	 					org__np;
ಗಾತಿಕ್:ಗಾತಿಕ್ 					org__np;
ಬರ್ಮನ್:ಬರ್ಮನ್ 					org__np;
ವೆರಿಸೈನ್:ವೆರಿಸೈನ್ 					org__np;
ಐಬಿಎಮ್:ಐಬಿಎಮ್ 					org__np;
ಎಂಪಾಸಿಸ್:ಎಂಪಾಸಿಸ್ 					org__np;
ಪ್ಯಾಟರ್ಸನ್:ಪ್ಯಾಟರ್ಸನ್ 	 							org__np;
ಇನ್ಫೋಸಿಸ್:ಇನ್ಫೋಸಿಸ್ 	 							org__np;
ಬಿಎಂಆರ್‌ಸಿ:ಬಿಎಂಆರ್‌ಸಿ 				Acronym‌/__np;
ಸಿಎಲ್:ಸಿಎಲ್ 						Acronym‌/__np;
ಕ್ರಿ.ಪೂ:ಕ್ರಿ.ಪೂ 					Acronym‌/__np;!B.C
ಎಸ್‌:ಎಸ್‌ 			 				Acronym‌/__np;
ಸಿಬಿಎಸ್ಇ:ಸಿಬಿಎಸ್ಇ 				Acronym‌/__np;!CBSE
ಡೆ : ಡೆ  							Acronym‌/__np;!D
ಎಂ:ಎಂ 							Acronym‌/__np;!M
ಓ:ಒ  							Acronym‌/__np;!O
ಜಿ:ಜಿ 							Acronym‌/__np;!G
ಕೆ:ಕೆ 								Acronym‌/__np;!K
ಎಕ್ಸ್.:ಎಕ್ಸ್ 						Acronym‌/__np;!ex or X
ಜಾಲಿ:ಜಾಲಿ 						neut__np;
ಜವಾರಿ :ಜವಾರಿ  					neut__np;
ಬೌದ್ಧ:ಬೌದ್ಧ 						neut__np;
ಇಸ್ಲಾಂ:ಇಸ್ಲಾಂ 					neut__np;
ಅಮೇರಿಕ:ಅಮೇರಿಕ 					ಭಾರತ__np;
ಬಿಜಾಪುರ:ಬಿಜಾಪೂರ 					ಭಾರತ__np;
ಆಸ್ಟ್ರೇಲಿಯಾ:ಆಸ್ಟ್ರೇಲಿಯಾ 			ಭಾರತ__np;
ಕರ್ನಾಟಕ:ಕರ್ನಾಟಕ					ಭಾರತ__np;
ಮುದ್ದೇಬಿಹಾಳ:ಮುದ್ದೇಬಿಹಾಳ 			ಭಾರತ__np;
ರಷ್ಯ:ರಷ್ಯ 						ಭಾರತ__np;
ಇಲಕಲ್ಲ:ಇಲಕಲ್ಲ 					ಭಾರತ__np;
ಮಿಲನ್:ಮಿಲನ್ 					ಭಾರತ__np;
ಏಷ್ಯ:ಏಷ್ಯ 						ಭಾರತ__np;
ದುಬೈ:ದುಬೈ                       	ಭಾರತ__np;
ಏಷ್ಯಾ:ಏಷ್ಯಾ 					ಭಾರತ__np;
ಟಿಬೆಟ್:ಟಿಬೆಟ್ 						ಭಾರತ__np;
ಫ್ರಾನ್ಸ:ಫ್ರ್ಯಾನ್ಸ್  				ಬೆಂಗಳೂರು__np;
ನ್ಯೂಜಿಲೆಂಡ್:ನ್ಯೂಜಿಲೆಂಡ್ 			ಬೆಂಗಳೂರು__np;
ಬರ್ಮಿಂಗ್ಹ್ಯಾಮ್:ಬರ್ಮಿಂಗ್ಹ್ಯಾಮ್   ಬೆಂಗಳೂರು__np;
ಸಿಂಧ್:ಸಿಂಧ್ 	 					ಬೆಂಗಳೂರು__np;
ವಿಂಬಲ್ಡನ್:ವಿಂಬಲ್ಡನ್ 				ಬೆಂಗಳೂರು__np;
ಬಾಲ್ಟಿಕ್:ಬಾಲ್ಟಿಕ್ 						ಬೆಂಗಳೂರು__np;
ಸೂರತ್:ಸೂರತ್ 						ಬೆಂಗಳೂರು__np;
ಒಸ್ಟಿನ್:ಒಸ್ಟಿನ್ 						ಬೆಂಗಳೂರು__np;
ಮಾರಿಷಸ್:ಮಾರಿಷಸ್ 						ಬೆಂಗಳೂರು__np;
ಮ್ಯೂನಿಚ್:ಮ್ಯೂನಿಚ್ 						ಬೆಂಗಳೂರು__np;
ಟ್ರಾಯ್:ಟ್ರಾಯ್ 						ಬೆಂಗಳೂರು__np;
ವೆಲ್ಲಿಂಗ್ಟನ್:ವೆಲ್ಲಿಂಗ್ಟನ್ 			ಬೆಂಗಳೂರು__np;
ಲಂಡನ್:ಲಂಡನ್ 						ಇಟಲಿ__np;
ಬಾಗೇವಾಡಿ:ಬಾಗೇವಾಡಿ 				ಇಟಲಿ__np;
ಶಿವಮೊಗ್ಗ:ಶಿವಮೊಗ್ಗ 				ಇಟಲಿ__np;
ಮದ್ರಾಸ್:ಮದ್ರಾಸ್ 					ಇಟಲಿ__np;
ಸೆಂಟೋಸಾ:ಸೆಂಟೋಸಾ 					ಇಟಲಿ__np;
ರೋಮ್:ರೋಮ್ 					ಇಟಲಿ__np;
ಕೆಂಗೇರಿ:ಕೆಂಗೇರಿ 						ಇಟಲಿ__np;
ಗುಬ್ಬಿ:ಗುಬ್ಬಿ 					ಇಟಲಿ__np;
ಜಮ್ಮು:ಜಮ್ಮು 					ಇಟಲಿ__np;
ಜರ್ಮನಿ:ಜರ್ಮನಿ 					ಇಟಲಿ__np;
ಬಾಗಲಕೋಟ:ಬಾಗಲಕೋಟ                ಇಟಲಿ__np;
ಚಿಕಾಗೊ:ಚಿಕಾಗೊ 					ಇಟಲಿ__np;
ಹಾಗಾಗಿ:ಹಾಗಾಗಿ 				__cnjsub;
ಆದುದರಿಂದ:ಆದುದರಿಂದ 			__cnjsub;
ಎಂದರ್ಥ:ಎಂದರ್ಥ 				__cnjsub;
ಕಾರಣ:ಕಾರಣ 					__cnjsub;
ದೆಸೆಯಿಂದ:ದೆಸೆಯಿಂದ 				__cnjsub;
ಯಾಕೆಂದರೆ:ಯಾಕೆಂದರೆ 				__cnjsub;
ಇದ್ದಲ್ಲಿ:ಇದ್ದಲ್ಲಿ 			__cnjsub;
ಆದಾಗ್ಯೂ:ಆದಾಗ್ಯೂ 			__cnjsub;
ಆದಾಗ್ಯೂ:ಅದಾಗ್ಯೂ 			__cnjsub;
ಹೂ:ಹೂ 						__inj;
ಹೈ:ಹೈ 						__inj;
ಹೌದು:ಹೌದು  					__inj;
ಸರಿ:ಸರಿ     					__inj;
ನಮಃ:ನಮಃ 					__inj;
ಸಾಕು:ಸಾಕು 					__inj;
ಜೈ:ಜೈ 						__inj;
ಹೇ:ಹೇ 						__inj;
ಅಷ್ಟೆ:ಅಷ್ಟೆ 					__inj;
ನಾ:ನ  			ನ/__prn;
ನೀ:ನ 		 	ನೀ/__prn;
ಇತರೆ:ಇತರ	 		ಇತರೆ/__prn;
ಇನ್ನಿತರ:ಇನ್ನಿತರ 	ಇತರೆ/__prn;
ಅನೇಕ:ಅನೇಕ 		ಇತರೆ/__prn;	
ಆಕೆ:ಆಕೆ 			ಆಕೆ/__prn;	
